test/src/morphology/V-vozjyny_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Verb - возьыны: # Verb MONO возьыны 'eng /udm /fin' - full paradigm
     возьыны+V+Inf: возьыны
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: возисько
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: возиськод
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: возе
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: [возиськом, возиськомы]
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: возиськоды
     возьыны+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: возё

     мыныны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg1: возиськы
     мыныны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg2: возиськы
     мыныны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Sg3: возы
     мыныны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl1: возиське
     мыныны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl2: возиське
     мыныны+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Pl3: возё

     мыныны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg1: возё
     мыныны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg2: возёд
     мыныны+V+Ind+Fut+Sg3: возёз
     мыныны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl1: [возём, возёмы]
     мыныны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl2: возёды
     мыныны+V+Ind+Fut+Pl3: возёзы
     возыны+V+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Sg: возы
     возыны+V+Ind+Fut+ConNeg+Pl: [возе, возелэ]

     # TODO:
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg1: ужай
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg2: ужад
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Sg3: ужаз
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl1: [ужамы, ужам]
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl2: ужады
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+Pl3: ужазы
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Sg: ужа
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtI+ConNeg+Pl: ужалэ

     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg1: ужаськем
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg2: ужамед
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Sg3: ужам
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl1: ужаськеммы
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl2: ужаллямды
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Pl3: [ужаллямзы, ужаллям]

     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg1: ужаськем
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg2: ужамед
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Sg3: ужам
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl1: ужаськеммы
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl2: ужаллямды
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+ConNeg+Pl3: [ужаллямзы, ужаллям]

     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg1: ужаськымтэе
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg2: ужамтэед
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Sg3: ужамтэ
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl1: ужаськымтэмы
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl2: ужамтэды
     # возьыны+V+Ind+PrtII+Neg+Pl3: [ужаллямтэзы, ужаллямтэ]

     # возьыны+V+Imprt+Sg2: ужа
     # возьыны+V+Imprt+Pl2: ужалэ
     # возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg2: ужа
     # возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl2: ужалэ

     # возьыны+V+Imprt+Sg3: ужалоз
     # возьыны+V+Imprt+Pl3: ужалозы
     # возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Sg3: ужа
     # возьыны+V+Imprt+ConNeg+Pl3: ужалэ

     # возьыны+V+Opt+Sg1: ужам
     # возьыны+V+Opt+Sg2: ужад
     # возьыны+V+Opt+Sg3: ужаз
     # возьыны+V+Opt+Pl1: ужамы
     # возьыны+V+Opt+Pl2: ужады
     # возьыны+V+Opt+Pl3: ужазы
     # возьыны+V+Opt+ConNeg+Sg: ужа
     # возьыны+V+Opt+ConNeg+Pl: [ужалэ, ужа]

     # возьыны+V+Cond+Sg1: ужасал
     # возьыны+V+Cond+Sg2: [ужасал, ужасалыд]
     # возьыны+V+Cond+Sg3: [ужасал, ужасалыз]
     # возьыны+V+Cond+Pl1: ужасалмы
     # возьыны+V+Cond+Pl2: ужасалды
     # возьыны+V+Cond+Pl3: ужасалзы

     # возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg1: ужасал
     # возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg2: [ужасал, ужасалыд]
     # возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Sg3: [ужасал, ужасалыз]
     # возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl1: ужасалмы
     # возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl2: ужасалды
     # возьыны+V+Cond+ConNeg+Pl3: ужасалзы

     # возьыны+V+PrcPrfAdn: ужам
     # возьыны+V+PrcPrfNeg: ужамтэ
     # возьыны+V+PrcPrfPred: ужамын

     # возьыны+V+PrcPrsPos: ужась
     # возьыны+V+PrcPrsNeg: ужасьтэм

     # возьыны+V+GerPos: ужаса
     # возьыны+V+GerNeg: ужатэк
